Montana, session 2025, SB484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Ticket speculators. (1) A person may not sell, offer for sale, or attempt
to sell any ticket, privilege, or license of admission to an entertainment event in this state, including but not
limited to a place of public amusement, arena, stadium, theatre, performance, sport, exhibition, or athletic
contest, at a price greater than the price, including tax, printed on the ticket and with a service charge for
services actually rendered exceeding $3 or 10% of the price printed on the ticket, whichever is greater.
(2) The owner or operator of the property on which an entertainment event is to be held or is being
held may authorize, in writing, a person to sell a ticket, privilege, or license of admission at a price in excess of
that authorized under this section. The written authorization must specify the price for which the ticket, privilege,
or license of admission may be sold.
(3) A person violating a provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and may be fined no
more than $1,000 for each offense.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 30, chapter 14, part 2, and the provisions of Title 30, chapter 14, part 2, apply to [section 1].
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 484